test/src/morphology/N-tyon_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - тёня: # Noun 'polar fox' - partial paradigm /Type 20/
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom: тёня
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc: тёнямʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen: тёняʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat: тёнянʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc: тёняхана
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl: тёняхад
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros: тёнявна
     тёня+N+Du+Nom: тёняхаʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc: тёняхаʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen: тёняхаʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom: тёняˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc: тён
#   ! -б > -в e.g. лабя > лав
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen: тёнˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat: тёняхаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc: тёняхаˮна
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl: тёняхат
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros: тёнˮмана    
     
     тёня+N+Tra: тёняӈэ
     тёня+N+Car: тёнясиˮ
     тёня+N+Equ: тёнядаремʼ
     тёня+N+Equ+Lat: тёнядаревʼ

# Possessive forms 

     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: тёняв 
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тёняр  
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тёняда 
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: тёнямиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: тёняриʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: тёнядиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: тёняваˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: тёняраˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: тёнядоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тёняв   
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тёнями  
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тёнямд  
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тёнямда 
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: тёнямиʼ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: тёнямдиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: тёнямдиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: тёняваˮ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: тёнямдаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: тёнямдоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тёнян   
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тёняни  
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тёнянд  
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тёнянда 
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: тёняниʼ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: тёняндиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: тёняндиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: тёнянаˮ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тёняндаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: тёняндоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тёняхан   
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тёняхани  
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: тёняханд  
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: тёняханда 
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: тёняханиʼ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: тёняхандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: тёняхандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: тёняханаˮ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: тёняхандаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: тёняхандоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тёняханан   
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тёняханани  
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: тёняхананд  
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: тёняхананда 
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: тёняхананиʼ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: тёняханандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: тёняханандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: тёняхананаˮ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: тёняханандаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: тёняханандоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тёняхадан   
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тёняхадани  
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: тёняхаданд  
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: тёняхаданда 
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: тёняхаданиʼ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: тёняхадандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: тёняхадандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: тёняхаданаˮ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: тёняхадандаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: тёняхадандоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тёнявнан   
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тёнявнани  
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: тёнявнанд  
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: тёнявнанда 
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: тёнявнаниʼ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: тёнявнандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: тёнявнандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: тёнявнанаˮ 
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: тёнявнандаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: тёнявнандоʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: тёняхаюн  
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: тёняхаюд  
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: тёняхаюда 
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: тёняхаюниʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: тёняхаюнаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: тёняхаюдаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: тёняхаюдоʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: тёняхаюн  
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: тёняхаюд  
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: тёняхаюда 
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: тёняхаюниʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: тёняхаюнаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: тёняхаюдаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: тёняхаюдоʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: тёняхаюн  
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: тёняхают  
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: тёняхаюта 
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: тёняхаюниʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: тёняхаютиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: тёняхаютиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: тёняхаюнаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: тёняхаютаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: тёняхаютоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тёнян   
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тёняд   
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тёняда  
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тёняниʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тёнядиʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тёнядиʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тёнянаˮ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тёнядаˮ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тёнядоʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тённ   #?   
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тёнд   
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тёнда  
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тённиʼ #?
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тёндиʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тёндиʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тённаˮ #?
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тёндаˮ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тёндоʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тёнˮн  #?
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тёнт   
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тёнта  
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тёнˮниʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тёнтиʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тёнтиʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тёнˮнаˮ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тёнтаˮ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тёнтоʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: тёняхаˮн 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: тёняхат 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: тёняхата 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: тёняхаˮниʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: тёняхатиʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: тёняхатиʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: тёняхаˮнаˮ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: тёняхатаˮ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: тёняхатоʼ 
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: тёняхаˮнан  
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: тёняхаˮнат  
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: тёняхаˮната 
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: тёняхаˮнаниʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: тёняхаˮнатиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: тёняхаˮнатиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: тёняхаˮнанаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: тёняхаˮнатаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: тёняхаˮнатоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [тёняхатан, тёняхатани]
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: тёняхатат 
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: тёняхатата 
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: тёняхатаниʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: тёняхататиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: тёняхататиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: тёняхатанаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: тёняхататаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: тёняхататоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тёнˮманан  
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тёнˮманат  
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тёнˮманата 
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тёнˮмананиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тёнˮманатиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тёнˮманатиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тёнˮмананаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тёнˮманатаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тёнˮманатоʼ
